Arkansas, session 2025, HB1175.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. REGULAR SALARIES - SHARED SERVICES. There is hereby
established for the Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism for the 2025-
2026 fiscal year, the following maximum number of regular employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item Class No. of Fiscal Year
No. Code Title Employees 2025-2026
(1) SC012 SECRETARY OF PARKS, HERITAGE & TOURISM 1 GRADE SE05
(2) U016U ADPHT DIR PARKS RECREATION & TRAVEL 1 GRADE SE03
(3) U018U ADPHT HERITAGE DIVISION DIRECTOR 1 GRADE SE02
(4) N213N ADPHT CHIEF FISCAL OFFICER 1 GRADE SE01
(5) U020U ADPHT HERITAGE DIVISION ASSISTANT DIR 1 GRADE SE01
*WFP013*
01/17/2025 3:38:43 PM WFP013

HB1175
(6) N250N ADPHT CHIEF INFORMATION OFFICER 1 GRADE IT10
(7) D007C INFORMATION SYSTEMS MANAGER 1 GRADE IT08
(8) D030C INFORMATION SYSTEMS COORDINATOR 1 GRADE IT07
(9) D017C INFORMATION SYSTEMS SECURITY SPECIALIST 1 GRADE IT07
(10) D029C SENIOR GIS ANALYST 1 GRADE IT07
(11) D040C GIS ANALYST 1 GRADE IT06
(12) D063C COMPUTER SUPPORT SPECIALIST 1 GRADE IT05
(13) D052C SOFTWARE SUPPORT ANALYST 3 GRADE IT05
(14) D062C DATABASE ANALYST 1 GRADE IT04
(15) D068C INFORMATION SYSTEMS ANALYST 2 GRADE IT04
(16) D065C NETWORK SUPPORT ANALYST 1 GRADE IT04
(17) D064C WEBSITE DEVELOPER 1 GRADE IT04
(18) D071C COMPUTER SUPPORT ANALYST 2 GRADE IT03
(19) G275C ADPHT ADMINISTRATION MANAGER 2 GRADE GS13
(20) G018C ADPHT PARKS ADMIN MANAGER 1 GRADE GS13
(21) A010C AGENCY CONTROLLER II 1 GRADE GS13
(22) G004C MANAGING ATTORNEY 1 GRADE GS13
(23) R006C HUMAN RESOURCES ADMINISTRATOR 2 GRADE GS12
(24) A031C ASSISTANT CONTROLLER 1 GRADE GS11
(25) G076C ADMINISTRATIVE SERVICES MANAGER 1 GRADE GS10
(26) V036C AGENCY PROCUREMENT ADMINISTRATOR 1 GRADE GS10
(27) A052C ACCOUNTING COORDINATOR 4 GRADE GS09
(28) A050C AGENCY FISCAL MANAGER 1 GRADE GS09
(29) G109C GRANTS MANAGER 1 GRADE GS09
(30) P004C PUBLIC INFORMATION MANAGER 3 GRADE GS09
(31) R021C BUDGET ANALYST 1 GRADE GS08
(32) E026C EDUCATION & INSTRUCTION COORDINATOR 1 GRADE GS08
(33) S004C MAINTENANCE MANAGER 1 GRADE GS08
(34) V004C PROCUREMENT MANAGER 1 GRADE GS08
(35) A089C ACCOUNTANT I 1 GRADE GS07
(36) P015C ADPHT MANAGER OF HISTORIC PROPERTIES 1 GRADE GS07
(37) G155C ADPHT PROGRAM MANAGER 1 GRADE GS07
(38) C010C EXECUTIVE ASSISTANT TO THE DIRECTOR 1 GRADE GS07
(39) P020C PRODUCTION ARTIST 2 GRADE GS07
(40) P013C PUBLIC INFORMATION COORDINATOR 1 GRADE GS07
(41) R025C HUMAN RESOURCES ANALYST 6 GRADE GS06
01/17/2025 3:38:43 PM WFP013

HB1175
(42) P027C PUBLIC INFORMATION SPECIALIST 5 GRADE GS06
(43) P019C TRAVEL INFORMATION WRITER 4 GRADE GS06
(44) C036C ADMINISTRATIVE REVIEW ANALYST 1 GRADE GS05
(45) C022C BUSINESS OPERATIONS SPECIALIST 3 GRADE GS05
(46) V014C BUYER 3 GRADE GS05
(47) V013C CENTRAL WAREHOUSE OPERATIONS MGR 1 GRADE GS05
(48) A091C FISCAL SUPPORT ANALYST 7 GRADE GS05
(49) A090C PAYROLL SERVICES SPECIALIST 1 GRADE GS05
(50) V015C PURCHASING SPECIALIST 1 GRADE GS05
(51) C056C ADMINISTRATIVE SPECIALIST III 1 GRADE GS04
(52) A098C FISCAL SUPPORT SPECIALIST 12 GRADE GS04
(53) R036C HUMAN RESOURCES SPECIALIST 1 GRADE GS04
(54) C083C MAIL SERVICES COORDINATOR 2 GRADE GS04
(55) P048C MULTI-MEDIA SPECIALIST 1 GRADE GS04
(56) V022C PURCHASING TECHNICIAN 1 GRADE GS04
(57) P045C PUBLIC INFORMATION TECHNICIAN 1 GRADE GS03
(58) V028C WAREHOUSE WORKER 1 GRADE GS02
(59) S065C MAINTENANCE ASSISTANT 1 GRADE GS01
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 105

SECTION 2. EXTRA HELP - SHARED SERVICES. There is hereby authorized,
for the Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism for the 2025-2026 fiscal
year, the following maximum number of part-time or temporary employees, to be
known as "Extra Help", payable from funds appropriated herein for such
purposes: eleven (11) temporary or part-time employees, when needed, at rates
of pay not to exceed those provided in the Uniform Classification and
Compensation Act, or its successor, or this act for the appropriate
classification.

SECTION 3. APPROPRIATION - SHARED SERVICES PAYING ACCOUNT. There is
hereby appropriated, to the Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism, to be
payable from the paying account as determined by the Chief Fiscal Officer of
the State, for personal services and operating expenses of the Department of
Parks, Heritage, and Tourism - Shared Services for the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2026, the following:

01/17/2025 3:38:43 PM WFP013

HB1175
ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $5,645,433
(02) EXTRA HELP 90,136
(03) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 2,092,798
(04) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 2,928,545
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 29,845
(C) PROF. FEES 93,241
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 50,000
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $10,929,998

SECTION 4. REGULAR SALARIES. There is hereby established for the
Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism - Division of Heritage for the
2025-2026 fiscal year, the following maximum number of regular employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item Class No. of Fiscal Year
No. Code Title Employees 2025-2026
(1) U020U ADPHT HERITAGE DIVISION ASSISTANT DIR 1 GRADE SE01
(2) P081C ADPHT MUSEUM & HERITAGE SRVS DIRECTOR 1 GRADE GS13
(3) P003C ADPHT AGENCY DIRECTOR 8 GRADE GS11
(4) P006C ADPHT AGENCY ASSISTANT DIRECTOR 4 GRADE GS09
(5) B045C BIOLOGIST SUPERVISOR 2 GRADE GS09
(6) B067C ARCHAEOLOGIST 2 GRADE GS08
(7) P014C MUSEUM MANAGER 1 GRADE GS08
(8) P015C ADPHT MANAGER OF HISTORIC PROPERTIES 4 GRADE GS07
(9) G155C ADPHT PROGRAM MANAGER 14 GRADE GS07
(10) P018C ARCHIVAL MANAGER 7 GRADE GS07
(11) B066C BIOLOGIST SPECIALIST 4 GRADE GS07
(12) P016C CURATOR 4 GRADE GS07
(13) P038C HISTORIAN 4 GRADE GS07
(14) G186C ADPHT PROGRAM COORDINATOR 16 GRADE GS06
(15) P024C ARCHIVIST 3 GRADE GS06
01/17/2025 3:38:43 PM WFP013

HB1175
(16) G171C COORD OF AFRICAN AMERICAN HIST PRGM 1 GRADE GS06
(17) G214C GRANTS SPECIALIST 1 GRADE GS06
(18) B086C LAND MANAGEMENT SPECIALIST 3 GRADE GS06
(19) E052C LIBRARIAN 1 GRADE GS06
(20) P037C MUSEUM INTERPRETIVE SPECIALIST 4 GRADE GS06
(21) P029C MUSEUM PROGRAMS SPECIALIST 1 GRADE GS06
(22) P047C MUSEUM REGISTRAR 2 GRADE GS06
(23) P036C MUSEUM STORE MANAGER 4 GRADE GS06
(24) G204C PLANNING SPECIALIST 1 GRADE GS06
(25) G202C VOLUNTEER PROGRAM COORDINATOR 1 GRADE GS06
(26) C036C ADMINISTRATIVE REVIEW ANALYST 1 GRADE GS05
(27) C022C BUSINESS OPERATIONS SPECIALIST 1 GRADE GS05
(28) C056C ADMINISTRATIVE SPECIALIST III 9 GRADE GS04
(29) P043C ARCHIVAL ASSISTANT 12 GRADE GS04
(30) S046C MAINTENANCE TECHNICIAN 3 GRADE GS04
(31) T072C SECURITY OFFICER SUPERVISOR 1 GRADE GS04
(32) S050C MAINTENANCE SPECIALIST 1 GRADE GS03
(33) P056C MUSEUM PROGRAM ASSISTANT II 5 GRADE GS03
(34) S065C MAINTENANCE ASSISTANT 4 GRADE GS01
(35) T091C WATCHMAN 2 GRADE GS01
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 133

SECTION 5. EXTRA HELP. There is hereby authorized, for the Department
of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism - Division of Heritage for the 2025-2026
fiscal year, the following maximum number of part-time or temporary
employees, to be known as "Extra Help", payable from funds appropriated
herein for such purposes: sixty-five (65) temporary or part-time employees,
when needed, at rates of pay not to exceed those provided in the Uniform
Classification and Compensation Act, or its successor, or this act for the
appropriate classification.

SECTION 6. APPROPRIATION - STATE OPERATIONS. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism, to be
payable from the Division of Arkansas Heritage Fund Account, for personal
services and operating expenses of the Department of Parks, Heritage, and
Tourism - Division of Heritage - State Operations for the fiscal year ending
01/17/2025 3:38:43 PM WFP013

HB1175
June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $3,763,075
(02) EXTRA HELP 63,924
(03) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 1,479,110
(04) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 1,142,659
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 7,206
(C) PROF. FEES 20,800
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $6,476,774

SECTION 7. APPROPRIATION - AMENDMENT 75 - CONSERVATION TAX OPERATIONS.
There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Parks, Heritage, and
Tourism, to be payable from the Arkansas Division of Heritage Special Fund
Account, for personal services, operating expenses, grants and aid,
construction, and special maintenance of the Department of Parks, Heritage,
and Tourism - Division of Heritage - Amendment 75 - Conservation Tax
Operations for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $1,090,286
(02) EXTRA HELP 421,640
(03) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 472,774
(04) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 2,458,170
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 100,000
(C) PROF. FEES 875,000
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 250,000
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(05) GRANTS/AID-HERITAGE PROGRAMS 1,113,841
(06) DAH-MUSEUM/FACILITY CONSTRUCTION 600,000
01/17/2025 3:38:43 PM WFP013

HB1175
(07) SPECIAL MAINTENANCE 688,471
(08) BLACK HISTORY COMMISSION 13,930
(09) GRANTS/AID-OUACHITA RIVER COMMISSION 20,000
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $8,104,112

SECTION 8. APPROPRIATION - DELTA CULTURAL CENTER - CASH FUND
OPERATIONS. There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Parks,
Heritage, and Tourism, to be payable from the cash fund deposited in the
State Treasury as determined by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, for
operating expenses and cost of goods sold for resale of the Department of
Parks, Heritage, and Tourism - Delta Cultural Center - Cash Fund Operations
for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE $75,000
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 0
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(02) RESALE (COGS) 45,000
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $120,000

SECTION 9. APPROPRIATION - MOSAIC TEMPLARS CULTURAL CENTER - CASH FUND
OPERATIONS. There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Parks,
Heritage, and Tourism, to be payable from the cash fund deposited in the
State Treasury as determined by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, for
museum gift shop operations and cost of goods sold for resale of the
Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism - Mosaic Templars of America
Center for African-American Culture and Business Enterprise - Cash Fund
Operations for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
01/17/2025 3:38:43 PM WFP013

HB1175
(A) OPER. EXPENSE $25,000
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 0
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(02) RESALE (COGS) 20,000
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $45,000

SECTION 10. APPROPRIATION - OLD STATE HOUSE COMMISSION - CASH FUND
OPERATIONS. There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Parks,
Heritage, and Tourism, to be payable from the cash fund deposited in the
State Treasury as determined by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, for
personal services, operating expenses, and cost of goods sold for resale of
the Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism - Old State House Commission -
Cash Fund Operations for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) EXTRA HELP $20,430
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 1,755
(03) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 100,000
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 500
(C) PROF. FEES 15,000
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(04) RESALE (COGS) 20,000
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $157,685

SECTION 11. APPROPRIATION - HISTORIC PRESERVATION - REAL ESTATE
TRANSFER TAX OPERATIONS. There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of
Parks, Heritage, and Tourism, to be payable from the Natural and Cultural
Resources Historic Preservation Fund, for personal services, operating
expenses, and grants and aid for historic preservation and main street
programs of the Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism - Historic
Preservation - Real Estate Transfer Tax Operations for the fiscal year ending
01/17/2025 3:38:43 PM WFP013

HB1175
June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $0
(02) EXTRA HELP 0
(03) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 0
(04) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 0
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 0
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(05) GRANTS AND AID FOR HISTORIC
PRESERVATION/MAIN STREET PROGRAMS 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $0

SECTION 12. APPROPRIATION - HISTORIC PRESERVATION - FEDERAL PROGRAM.
There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Parks, Heritage, and
Tourism, to be payable from the federal funds as designated by the Chief
Fiscal Officer of the State, for personal services, operating expenses, and
grants and aid for historic preservation of the Department of Parks,
Heritage, and Tourism - Historic Preservation - Federal Program for the
fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $705,955
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 273,038
(03) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 125,000
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 5,000
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(04) GRANTS AND AID FOR HISTORIC
01/17/2025 3:38:43 PM WFP013

HB1175
PRESERVATION 500,000
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $1,608,993

SECTION 13. APPROPRIATION - HISTORIC PRESERVATION - MAIN STREET
ARKANSAS - CASH FUND OPERATIONS. There is hereby appropriated, to the
Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism, to be payable from the cash fund
deposited in the State Treasury as determined by the Chief Fiscal Officer of
the State, for personal services and operating expenses of the Department of
Parks, Heritage, and Tourism - Historic Preservation - Main Street Arkansas -
Cash Fund Operations for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $59,493
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 21,586
(03) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 25,000
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 0
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $106,079

SECTION 14. APPROPRIATION - NATURAL HERITAGE COMMISSION - NATURAL AREA
MANAGEMENT - CASH FUND OPERATIONS. There is hereby appropriated, to the
Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism, to be payable from the cash fund
deposited in the State Treasury as determined by the Chief Fiscal Officer of
the State, for operating expenses, special maintenance, and land acquisition
of the Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism - Natural Heritage
Commission - Natural Area Management - Cash Fund Operations for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE $50,000
01/17/2025 3:38:43 PM WFP013

HB1175
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 1,000
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(02) SPECIAL MAINTENANCE 10,000
(03) LAND ACQUISITION 195,076
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $256,076

SECTION 15. APPROPRIATION - NATURAL HERITAGE COMMISSION - NATURAL AREA
RESEARCH - CASH FUND OPERATIONS. There is hereby appropriated, to the
Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism, to be payable from the cash fund
deposited in the State Treasury as determined by the Chief Fiscal Officer of
the State, for personal services and operating expenses of the Department of
Parks, Heritage, and Tourism - Natural Heritage Commission - Natural Area
Research - Cash Fund Operations for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the
following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) EXTRA HELP $10,000
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 1,632
(03) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 10,000
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 0
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $21,632

SECTION 16. APPROPRIATION - NATURAL HERITAGE COMMISSION - GAS ROYALTY
EXPENSES. There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Parks,
Heritage, and Tourism, to be payable from the Division of Arkansas Heritage
Fund Account, for gas royalty expenses of the Department of Parks, Heritage,
and Tourism - Natural Heritage Commission - Gas Royalty Expenses for the
fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

01/17/2025 3:38:43 PM WFP013

HB1175
ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) GAS ROYALTY EXPENSES $440,000

SECTION 17. APPROPRIATION - NATURAL HERITAGE COMMISSION - FEDERAL
PROGRAM. There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Parks, Heritage,
and Tourism, to be payable from the federal funds as designated by the Chief
Fiscal Officer of the State, for personal services, operating expenses,
special maintenance, and land acquisition of the Department of Parks,
Heritage, and Tourism - Natural Heritage Commission - Federal Program for the
fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $49,143
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 19,208
(03) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 200,000
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 1,000
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(04) SPECIAL MAINTENANCE 20,000
(05) LAND ACQUISITION 1,700,000
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $1,989,351

SECTION 18. APPROPRIATION - HISTORIC ARKANSAS MUSEUM COMMISSION - CASH
FUND OPERATIONS. There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Parks,
Heritage, and Tourism, to be payable from the cash fund deposited in the
State Treasury as determined by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, for
personal services, operating expenses, and cost of goods sold for resale of
the Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism - Historic Arkansas Museum
Commission - Cash Fund Operations for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026,
the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
01/17/2025 3:38:43 PM WFP013

HB1175
NO. 2025-2026
(01) EXTRA HELP $113,550
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 11,015
(03) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 10,000
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 1,250
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(04) RESALE (COGS) 55,000
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $190,815

SECTION 19. APPROPRIATION - ARKANSAS STATE ARCHIVES - CASH FUND
OPERATIONS. There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Parks,
Heritage, and Tourism, to be payable from the cash fund deposited in the
State Treasury as determined by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, for
operating expenses of the Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism -
Arkansas State Archives - Cash Fund Operations for the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE $35,000
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 0
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $35,000

SECTION 20. APPROPRIATION - ARKANSAS STATE ARCHIVES - NATIONAL DIGITAL
NEWSPAPER PROGRAM. There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Parks,
Heritage, and Tourism, to be payable from the federal funds as designated by
the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, for personal services and operating
expenses of the Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism - Arkansas State
Archives - National Digital Newspaper Program for the fiscal year ending June
01/17/2025 3:38:43 PM WFP013

HB1175
30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $181,476
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 49,605
(03) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 66,500
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 10,000
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $307,581

SECTION 21. APPROPRIATION - ARKANSAS ARTS COUNCIL - FEDERAL PROGRAM.
There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Parks, Heritage, and
Tourism, to be payable from the federal funds as designated by the Chief
Fiscal Officer of the State, for personal services, operating expenses, and
grants and aid of the Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism - Arkansas
Arts Council - Federal Program for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the
following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $45,301
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 20,592
(03) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 82,385
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 10,000
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(04) GRANTS AND AID-ARTS PROGRAMS 738,063
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $896,341

SECTION 22. APPROPRIATION - ARKANSAS ARTS COUNCIL - CASH FUND
01/17/2025 3:38:43 PM WFP013

HB1175
OPERATIONS. There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Parks,
Heritage, and Tourism, to be payable from the cash fund deposited in the
State Treasury as determined by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, for
operating expenses and grants and aid of the Department of Parks, Heritage,
and Tourism - Arkansas Arts Council - Cash Fund Operations for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE $14,210
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 6,000
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(02) GRANTS/AID BY THE ARTS COUNCIL 278,979
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $299,189

SECTION 23. APPROPRIATION - NATURAL AND CULTURAL RESOURCES COUNCIL -
ADMINISTRATION. There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Parks,
Heritage, and Tourism, to be payable from the Arkansas Natural and Cultural
Resources Grant and Trust Fund, for personal services, operating expenses,
and grants and aid of the Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism -
Natural and Cultural Resources Council - Administration for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $0
(02) EXTRA HELP 0
(03) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 0
(04) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 0
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 0
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
01/17/2025 3:38:43 PM WFP013

HB1175
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(05) GRANTS AND AID NATURAL AND CULTURAL
RESOURCES COUNCIL 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $0

SECTION 24. APPROPRIATION - NATURAL AND CULTURAL RESOURCES COUNCIL -
STATE OWNED LANDS OR HISTORIC SITES GRANT PROGRAM. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism, to be
payable from the Arkansas Natural and Cultural Resources Grant and Trust
Fund, for grants for the acquisition, management, stewardship, or
preservation of state owned lands, historic sites, buildings, structures, or
objects of the Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism - Natural and
Cultural Resources Council - State Owned Lands or Historic Sites Grant
Program for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) GRANTS/AID FOR STATE-OWNED LANDS OR
HISTORIC SITES $48,000,000

SECTION 25. APPROPRIATION - NATURAL AND CULTURAL RESOURCES COUNCIL -
MAIN STREET PROGRAM. There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of
Parks, Heritage, and Tourism, to be payable from the Natural and Cultural
Resources Historic Preservation Fund, for funds to augment federal funding
and provide programs and grants of the Department of Parks, Heritage, and
Tourism - Natural and Cultural Resources Council - Main Street Program for
the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) GRANTS/AID FOR HISTORIC PRESERVATION
PROGRAM & MAIN STREET PROGRAM $6,000,000

SECTION 26. APPROPRIATION - ARKANSAS MAJOR HISTORIC REHABILITATION
PROGRAM. There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Parks, Heritage,
and Tourism, to be payable from the Arkansas Major Historic Rehabilitation
01/17/2025 3:38:43 PM WFP013

HB1175
Trust Fund, for expenses to offset the cost of the income tax credits allowed
under the Arkansas Major Historic Rehabilitation Income Tax Credit Act of the
Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism - Arkansas Major Historic
Rehabilitation Program for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the
following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) ARKANSAS MAJOR HISTORIC
REHABILITATION PROGRAM EXPENSES $40,000,000

SECTION 27. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW.
PROMOTIONAL AND EDUCATIONAL MATERIALS. The Division of Arkansas Heritage is
hereby authorized to purchase from Maintenance and General Operations
appropriations provided by this Act, up to an amount not to exceed $40,000
each fiscal year, promotional and educational merchandise, authorized by the
Division Director of the Division of Arkansas Heritage, to inform the public
of the Division's programs, to promote the functions of the Division, and to
inform the public regarding the services provided by the Division.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 28. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. ARKANSAS
NATURAL AND CULTURAL RESOURCES COUNCIL. The Secretary of the Department of
Parks, Heritage, and Tourism shall be the disbursing officer for the Arkansas
Natural and Cultural Resources Council appropriation and the Main Street
Program appropriation provided by this Act. Further, if grants are made to
state agencies from the Arkansas Natural and Cultural Resources Council
appropriation, and the Main Street Program appropriation provided herein, the
corresponding amount of appropriation and funding of such grant may be
transferred to such state agency for use in classifications of expenditures
as determined by conditions of the grant and the state agency.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.
01/17/2025 3:38:43 PM WFP013

HB1175
SECTION 29. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW.
SHARED SERVICES. (a)(1) The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State may create a
Shared Services paying accounts on his or her books and on the books of the
Treasurer of State and the Auditor of State for the payment of personal
services and operating expenses in the Shared Services Paying Account
Appropriation by the Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism.
(2) The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State shall direct the transfer
of funds and appropriations to the Shared Services Paying Account
appropriation section of this act on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State.
(3) The transfer authority provided to the department in
subdivision (a)(2) of this section may be used to make transfers only within
the department's appropriation act or between other appropriation acts
authorized for the department.
(4) The provisions of this section shall be in effect from the date
of passage through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 30. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW.
OUACHITA RIVER COMMISSION. The Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism -
Division of Heritage shall budget, allocate, and expend twenty thousand
dollars ($20,000) in grants to the Ouachita River Commission from the
Grants/Aid-Ouachita River Commission line item in the Amendment 75 -
Conservation Tax Operations appropriation section, to be used exclusively as
determined by the Ouachita River Commission.
The provisions of this section shall be in affect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 31. COMPLIANCE WITH OTHER LAWS. Disbursement of funds
authorized by this act shall be limited to the appropriation for such agency
and funds made available by law for the support of such appropriations; and
the restrictions of the State Procurement Law, the General Accounting and
Budgetary Procedures Law, the Revenue Stabilization Law, the Regular Salary
Procedures and Restrictions Act, or their successors, and other fiscal
control laws of this State, where applicable, and regulations promulgated by
01/17/2025 3:38:43 PM WFP013

HB1175
the Department of Finance and Administration, as authorized by law, shall be
strictly complied with in disbursement of said funds.

SECTION 32. LEGISLATIVE INTENT. It is the intent of the General
Assembly that any funds disbursed under the authority of the appropriations
contained in this act shall be in compliance with the stated reasons for
which this act was adopted, as evidenced by the Agency Requests, Executive
Recommendations and Legislative Recommendations contained in the budget
manuals prepared by the Department of Finance and Administration, letters, or
summarized oral testimony in the official minutes of the Arkansas Legislative
Council or Joint Budget Committee which relate to its passage and adoption.

SECTION 33. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the
General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits
the appropriation of funds for more than a one (1) year period; that the
effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 2025 is essential to the operation of
the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in
the event of an extension of the legislative session, the delay in the
effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 2025 could work irreparable harm
upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental
programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act
being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health
and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 2025.













01/17/2025 3:38:43 PM WFP013